Utah statutes.
61-1-22.   Sales and purchases in violation -- Remedies -- Limitation of
actions.
(1) (a)  This Subsection (1) applies to a person who:
(i)  offers or sells a security in violation of:
(A)  Subsection 61-1-3(1);
(B)  Section 61-1-7;
(C)  Subsection 61-1-17(2);
(D)  a rule or order under Section 61-1-15, which requires the affirmative
approval of sales literature before it is used; or
(E)  a condition imposed under Subsection 61-1-10(4) or 61-1-11(7); or
(ii)  offers, sells, or purchases a security in violation of Subsection
61-1-1(2).
(b)  A person described in Subsection (1)(a) is liable to a person selling the
security to or buying the security from the person described in Subsection
(1)(a).  The person to whom the person described in Subsection (1)(a) is
liable may sue either at law or in equity to recover the consideration paid
for the security, together with interest at 12% per year from the date of
payment, costs, and reasonable attorney fees, less the amount of income
received on the security, upon the tender of the security or for damages if
the person no longer owns the security.
(c)  Damages are an amount calculated as follows:
(i)  subtract from the amount that would be recoverable upon a tender under
Subsection (7)(b) the value of the security when the buyer disposed of the
security; and
(ii)  add to the amount calculated under Subsection (1)(c)(i) interest at:
(A)  12% per year:
(I)  beginning the day on which the security is purchased by the buyer; and
(II)  ending on the date of disposition; and
(B)  after the period described in Subsection (1)(c)(ii)(A), 12% per year on
the amount lost at disposition.
(2)  The court in a suit brought under Subsection (1) may award an amount
equal to three times the consideration paid for the security, together with
interest, costs, and attorney fees, less any amounts, all as specified in
Subsection (1) upon a showing that the violation was reckless or intentional.
(3)  A person who offers or sells a security in violation of Subsection
61-1-1(2) is not liable under Subsection (1)(a) if the purchaser knew of the
untruth or omission, or the seller did not know and in the exercise of
reasonable care could not have known of the untrue statement or misleading
omission.
(4) (a)  Every person who directly or indirectly controls a seller or buyer
liable under Subsection (1), every partner, officer, or director of such a
seller or buyer, every person occupying a similar status or performing similar
functions, every employee of such a seller or buyer who materially aids in the
sale or purchase, and every broker-dealer or agent who materially aids in the
sale or purchase are also liable jointly and severally with and to the same
extent as the seller or purchaser, unless the nonseller or nonpurchaser who is
so liable sustains the burden of proof that the nonseller or nonpurchaser did
not know, and in exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the
existence of the facts by reason of which the liability is alleged to exist.
(b)  There is contribution as in cases of contract among the several persons
so liable.
(5)  A tender specified in this section may be made at any time before entry
of judgment.
(6)  A cause of action under this section survives the death of a person who
might have been a plaintiff or defendant.
(7) (a)  An action may not be maintained to enforce liability under this
section unless brought before the earlier of:
(i)  the expiration of five years after the act or transaction constituting
the violation; or
(ii)  the expiration of two years after the discovery by the plaintiff of the
facts constituting the violation.
(b)  A person may not sue under this section if:
(i)  the buyer or seller received a written offer, before suit and at a time
when the buyer or seller owned the security, to refund the consideration paid
together with interest at 12% per year from the date of payment, less the
amount of any income received on the security, and the buyer or seller failed
to accept the offer within 30 days of its receipt; or
(ii)  the buyer or seller received such an offer before suit and at a time
when the buyer or seller did not own the security, unless the buyer or seller
rejected the offer in writing within 30 days of its receipt.
(8)  A person who has made or engaged in the performance of any contract in
violation of this chapter or any rule or order issued under this chapter, or
who has acquired a purported right under any such contract with knowledge of
the facts by reason of which its making or performance was in violation, may
not base a suit on the contract.
(9)  A condition, stipulation, or provision binding a person acquiring a
security to waive compliance with this chapter or a rule or order issued under
this chapter is void.
(10) (a)  The rights and remedies provided by this chapter are in addition to
any other rights or remedies that may exist at law or in equity.
(b)  This chapter does not create a cause of action not specified in this
section or Subsection 61-1-4(6).
